Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2618.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1503(c) introductory paragraph and (1) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended, the subsection is amended by adding paragraphs and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1503. Persons ineligible for licensing; license issuance to minors; junior driver's license.* * *(c) Junior driver's license.--The department may issue a junior driver's license to a person 16 or 17 years of age under rules and regulations adopted by the department and subject to the provisions of this section. A junior driver's license shall automatically become a regular driver's license when the junior 123456789101112131415161718 driver attains 18 years of age. The following provisions apply to licensed junior drivers:(1) Except as provided in [paragraph] paragraphs (2), (2.2) and (2.3), no licensed junior driver shall drive a vehicle upon a public highway between 11 p.m. and 5 a.m. unless accompanied by a spouse 18 years of age or older, a parent or a person in loco parentis.* * *(2.2) A licensed junior driver conforming to the requirements of section 1507 may drive a vehicle upon a public highway between 11 p.m. and 5 a.m. between the junior driver's home and a school-sponsored activity if the junior driver is a participant of the school-sponsored activity and is in possession of a letter from the school entity or agent of the school entity. The following provisions shall apply:(i) The letter shall specify the need for the junior driver to operate a vehicle between the junior driver's home and a school-sponsored activity for a single school-sponsored activity or multiple school-sponsored activities in a school year between 11 p.m. and 5 a.m.(ii) The letter shall specify a date and general time as to when the school-sponsored activity will conclude.(iii) The letter may be in an electronic or physical format.(iv) The school entity, including the employee or agent of the school entity, shall not be liable for any civil damages or criminal penalties that may arise as a result of the issuance of the letter to the junior driver.20260HB2618PN3570 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2.3) If a licensed junior driver operates a vehicle between 11 p.m. and 5 a.m. between the junior driver's home and a school-sponsored activity and is stopped by a police officer, is unable to provide the letter required under paragraph (2.2) and is cited for a violation of subsection (c)(1), a magisterial district judge, magistrate or judge shall dismiss the charges if the junior driver prior to or at the junior driver's hearing provides evidence of acquisition of a letter required under paragraph (2.2) to the magisterial district judge, magistrate or judge.* * *(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agent." Any individual, whether employed, contracted, volunteering or otherwise authorized, who acts on behalf of or is affiliated with a school entity in any capacity, including staff, educators, volunteers, chaperones and other organizers of school-related activities."Nonpublic school." A school, other than a public school within this Commonwealth, in which a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school or nonpublic school."School-sponsored activity." An assembly, field trip, class trip, graduation ceremony, interscholastic athletic activity, extracurricular activity, club, group, team or an activity 20260HB2618PN3570 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sponsored, held or approved by a school entity.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2618PN3570 - 4 - 12